Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.832

Background checks—Disclosure of information—Sharing of state criminal background information by health care facilities.

(1) The Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section shall disclose conviction records as follows:

(a) An applicant's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization as defined in RCW 43.43.830, a developmentally disabled person, or a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian;

(b) The conviction record of an applicant for certification, upon the request of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(c) Any conviction record to aid in the investigation and prosecution of child, developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse, upon the request of a law enforcement agency, the office of the attorney general, prosecuting authority, or the department of social and health services; and

(d) A prospective client's or resident's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization that qualifies for exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) and that provides emergency shelter or transitional housing for children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of children, youth, and families must establish rules and set standards to require specific action when considering the information received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and when considering additional information including but not limited to civil adjudication proceedings as defined in RCW 43.43.830 and any out-of-state equivalent, in the following circumstances:

(a) When considering persons for state employment in positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities provided that: For persons residing in a home that will be utilized to provide foster care for dependent youth, a criminal background check will be required for all persons aged sixteen and older and the department of children, youth, and families may require a criminal background check for persons who are younger than sixteen in situations where it may be warranted to ensure the safety of youth in foster care;

(b) When considering persons for state positions involving unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;

(c) When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in positions directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;

(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment, including peer counseling, of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW;

(e) When individual providers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240 or providers paid by home care agencies provide in-home services involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW.

(3) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records of current employees and of any person actively being considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children, or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards. "Considered for any position" includes decisions about (a) initial hiring, layoffs, reallocations, transfers, promotions, or demotions, or (b) other decisions that result in an individual being in a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children as an employee, an intern, or a volunteer.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules and investigate conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records, in the following circumstances:

(a) When licensing or certifying agencies with individuals in positions that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood education services, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(b) When authorizing individuals who will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services in licensed or certified agencies, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(c) When contracting with any business or organization for activities that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services;

(d) When establishing the eligibility criteria for individual providers to receive state paid subsidies to provide child day care or early learning services that will or may involve unsupervised access to children; and

(e) When responding to a request from an individual for a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW.

(5) Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent contractors on a conditional basis pending completion of the state background investigation. Whenever a national criminal record check through the federal bureau of investigation is required by state law, a person may be employed or engaged as a volunteer or independent contractor on a conditional basis pending completion of the national check. The office of financial management shall adopt rules to accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state employees. The department of social and health services shall adopt rules to accomplish the purpose of this subsection as it applies to long-term care workers subject to RCW 74.39A.056.

(6)(a) For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal background information and to reasonably minimize the number of requests made under this section, recognizing that certain health care providers change employment frequently, health care facilities may, upon request from another health care facility, share copies of completed Washington state criminal background inquiry information.

(b) Completed state criminal background inquiry information may be shared by a willing health care facility only if the following conditions are satisfied: The licensed health care facility sharing the state criminal background inquiry information is reasonably known to be the person's most recent employer, no more than twelve months has elapsed from the date the person was last employed at a licensed health care facility to the date of their current employment application, and the state criminal background information is no more than two years old.

(c) If state criminal background inquiry information is shared, the health care facility employing the subject of the inquiry must require the applicant to sign a disclosure statement indicating that there has been no conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842 since the completion date of the most recent criminal background inquiry.

(d) Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe that an applicant has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall be prohibited from relying on the applicant's previous employer's state criminal background inquiry information. A new state criminal background inquiry shall be requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.

(e) Health care facilities that share state criminal background inquiry information shall be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of this information in accordance with this subsection.

(f) Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the state criminal background inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the subject's rights to privacy and confidentiality.

(7) The department of social and health services may not consider any final founded finding of physical abuse or negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child made pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW that is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement or dependency as a result of a finding of abuse or neglect pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement when evaluating an applicant or employee's character, competency, and suitability pursuant to any background check authorized or required by this chapter, RCW 43.20A.710 or 74.39A.056, or any of the rules adopted thereunder.

[ 2023 c 223 s 2; 2021 c 203 s 1; 2020 c 270 s 7; 2019 c 146 s 6. Prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 20 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 224; prior: 2012 c 44 s 2; 2012 c 10 s 41; 2011 c 253 s 6; 2007 c 387 s 10; 2006 c 263 s 826; 2005 c 421 s 2; 2000 c 87 s 1; 1997 c 392 s 524; 1995 c 250 s 2; 1993 c 281 s 51; 1990 c 3 s 1102; prior: 1989 c 334 s 2; 1989 c 90 s 2; 1987 c 486 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 203: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 10, 2021]." [ 2021 c 203 s 18.]

Retroactive application—2021 c 203: "This act is remedial and curative in nature and all of its sections apply retroactively to February 29, 2020, to include the period of the state of emergency created by the COVID-19 outbreak. In any instance where this act grants rule-making authority to the department of social and health services or the department of health, the agencies may adopt the rules as emergency rules and may make the rules retroactively effective." [ 2021 c 203 s 19.]

Effective date—2020 c 270: See note following RCW 74.13.720.

Construction—Competitive procurement process and contract provisions—Conflict with federal requirements and Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978—2017 3rd sp.s. c 20: See notes following RCW 74.13.270.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Short title—Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Part headings and captions not law—1997 c 392: See notes following RCW 74.39A.009.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.